District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1219.12

Revitalization Plan.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 11, 1998, D.C. Law 12-144, § 13, 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-169, § 301(e), 45 DCR 5187
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 2401(c), 45 DCR 7193
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1102(c), 46 DCR 6373
June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 705(b)(1), 48 DCR 3804
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 103(a), 55 DCR 1689

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2295.12.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2001(c) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and see § 2001(c) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2001(c) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1102(c) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).